Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Child Passenger Restraint Devices

§ 63-7-301.
Requirement of device or belt positioning booster seat system; failure to provide and use device or belt positioning booster seat system not deemed negligence.

Every person transporting a child under the age of four (4) years in a passenger motor vehicle, and operated on a public roadway, street or highway within this state, shall provide for the protection of the child by properly using a child passenger restraint device or system meeting applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards.

Every person transporting a child in a passenger motor vehicle operated on a public roadway, street or highway within this state, shall provide for the protection of the child by properly using a belt positioning booster seat system meeting applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards if the child is at least four (4) years of age, but less than seven (7) years of age and measures less than four (4) feet nine (9) inches in height or weighs less than sixty-five (65) pounds.

If more than two (2) children who are required under subsection (1) of this section to use a booster seat are being transported in a vehicle at one time, and the vehicle only has two (2) lap and shoulder belts in the rear seat, then only the two (2) children sitting in the seats with the lap and shoulder belts are required to use a belt positioning booster seat system and safety belt, and any other children may be secured with a safety seat lap belt only.

The term “passenger motor vehicle” as used in Sections 63-7-301 through 63-7-311 has the same meaning as defined in Section 63-2-1(2). Sections 63-7-301 through 63-7-311 do not apply to the vehicles described in Section 63-2-1(3).

Failure to provide and use a child passenger restraint device or system or a belt positioning booster seat system shall not be considered contributory or comparative negligence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 400, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 325, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 501, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 520, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 63-7-303.
Duties, rights, liabilities, etc., between parent and child.

No provision of Sections 63-7-301 through 63-7-313 shall be construed as creating any duty, standard of care, right or liability between parent and child that is not recognized under the laws of the State of Mississippi as they exist on July 1, 1983, or as they may at any time in the future be constituted by statute or court decision.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 400, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-7-305.
Enforcement.

The provisions of Section 63-7-301 may be enforced by any duly sworn law enforcement officer of this state, or of any county or political subdivision thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 400, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-7-307.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1998, ch. 501, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

[Laws, 1983, ch. 400, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1983]

§ 63-7-309.
Penalties.

Any person convicted of violating the provisions of Section 63-7-301 shall be fined not more than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 400, § 5; Laws, 1990, ch. 358, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 63-7-311.
Notice of requirement for devices.

The state tax commission shall provide notice of the requirement for child restraint devices or systems, which notice shall accompany the delivery of a motor vehicle license tag.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 400, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-7-313.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1990, ch. 358, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

[Laws, 1983, ch. 400, § 7]